Utah statutes.
53-7-212.   Powers of fire marshal in respect to investigation.
In investigating any fire the state fire marshal and his deputy may:
(1)  subpoena witnesses;
(2)  compel their attendance and testimony; and
(3)  require the production of books, papers, documents, records, and other
tangible items that constitute or may contain evidence relevant to the
investigation in the judgment of the state fire marshal or his deputy.
